test/src/morphology/myv-tests_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - марямс: # Verb1
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill: марямс
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px1Sg: марямозон
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px2Sg: марямозот
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px3Sg: марямозонзо
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px1Pl: марямозонок
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px2Pl: марямозонк
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px3Pl: марямозост
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc: марямо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Sg: марямон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Sg: марямот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Sg: марямонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Pl: марямонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Pl: марямонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Pl: марямост
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl: марямодо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px1Sg: марямодон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px2Sg: марямодот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px3Sg: марямодонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px1Pl: марямодонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px2Pl: марямодонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px3Pl: марямодост
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl: марямга
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Sg: марямган
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Sg: марямгат
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Sg: марямганзо
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Pl: марямганок
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Pl: марямганк
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Pl: марямгаст
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela: марямсто
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Sg: марямстон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Sg: марямстот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Sg: марямстонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Pl: марямстонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Pl: марямстонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Pl: марямстост
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+NonPast: марямс
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+NonPast+1Sg: марямсан
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+NonPast+2Sg: марямсат
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+NonPast+1Pl: марямстано
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+NonPast+2Pl: марямстадо
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+1Sg: марямсолинь
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+2Sg: марямсолить
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+3Sg: марямсоль
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+1Pl: марямсолинек
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+2Pl: марямсолиде
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Sugg+Ind+Prt2+3Pl: марямсольть
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast: маряма
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+1Sg: маряман
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+2Sg: марямат
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+1Pl: маряматано
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+2Pl: маряматадо
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+3Pl: марямат
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+1Sg: марямалинь
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+2Sg: марямалить
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2: марямаль
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+1Pl: марямалинек
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+2Pl: марямалиде
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+3Pl: марямальть
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State: марязь
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+1Sg: марязян
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+2Sg: марязят
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+1Pl: марязтяно
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+2Pl: марязтядо
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+3Pl: марязть
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+1Sg: марязелинь
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+2Sg: марязелить
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+3Sg: марязель
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+1Pl: марязелинек
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+2Pl: марязелиде
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+3Pl: марязельть
     марямс+V+Der/Онь+Gen: марянь
     марямс+V+Der/Овт+TelicN: марявт
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+VN: марямо
     марямс+V+Der/Ы+Ptc: мари
     марямс+V+Der/Ы+Ptc+Der/кс: марикс
     марямс+V+Der/Ый+Ptc: марий
     марямс+V+Der/Ыця+Ptc+Restrict: мариця
     марямс+V+ConNeg: маря
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Sg: маряк
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Sg\3Sg: марик
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Sg\1Sg: марямак
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Sg\3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Pl: марядо
     марямс+V+Imprt+2Pl\3: маринк
     марямс+V+Imprt+Default\1: марямизь
     марямс+V+Opt+1Sg: марязан
     марямс+V+Opt+2Sg: марязат
     марямс+V+Opt+3Sg: марязо
     марямс+V+Opt+1Pl: марязтано
     марямс+V+Opt+2Pl: марязтадо
     марямс+V+Opt+3Pl: марязт
     марямс+V+Opt+1Sg\3Sg: марязса
     марямс+V+Opt+2Sg\3Sg: марязсак
     марямс+V+Opt+3Sg\3Sg: марязсо
     марямс+V+Opt+1Sg\3Pl: марязсынь
     марямс+V+Opt+2Sg\3Pl: марязсыть
     марямс+V+Opt+3Sg\3Pl: марязсынзе
     марямс+V+Opt+1Pl\3: марязсынек
     марямс+V+Opt+2Pl\3: марязсынк
     марямс+V+Opt+3Pl\3: марязсызь
     марямс+V+Opt+1Sg\2Sg: маряздан
     марямс+V+Opt+3Sg\2Sg: марянзат
     марямс+V+Opt+Default\2: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+2Sg\1Sg: марязмак
     марямс+V+Opt+3Sg\1Sg: марязмам
     марямс+V+Opt+Default\2: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Sg: марян
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Sg: марят
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Sg: мари
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Pl: марятано
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Pl: марятадо
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\3Sg: маряса
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\3Sg: марясак
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\3Sg: марясы
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\3Pl: марясынь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\3Pl: марясыть
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\3Pl: марясынзе
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Pl\3: марясынек
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Pl\3: марясынк
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Pl\3: марясызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\2Sg: марятан
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\2Sg: марятанзат
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Default\2: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\1Sg: марясамак
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\1Sg: марясамам
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Default\2: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Sg: маринь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Sg: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Sg: марясь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Pl: маринек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Pl: мариде
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Pl: марясть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\3Sg: мария
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\3Sg: марик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\3Sg: маризе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\3Pl: маринь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\3Pl: маринзе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Pl\3: маринек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Pl\3: маринк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Pl\3: маризь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\2Sg: маритинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\2Sg: маринзеть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Default\2: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\1Sg: маримик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\1Sg: маримим
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Default\2: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Sg: марилинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Sg: марилить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Sg: мариль
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Pl: марилинек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Pl: марилиде
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Pl: марильть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Sg\3Sg: марилия
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Sg\3Sg: марилик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\3Sg: марилизе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Sg\3Pl: марилинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Sg\3Pl: марилить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\3Pl: марилинзе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Pl\3: марилинек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Pl\3: марилинк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Pl\3: марилизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+1Sg\2Sg: марилитинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\2Sg: марилинзеть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Default\2: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+2Sg\1Sg: марилимик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\1Sg: марилимим
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Default\2: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+1Sg: марявлинь
     марямс+V+Conj+2Sg: марявлить
     марямс+V+Conj+3Sg: маряволь
     марямс+V+Conj+1Pl: марявлинек
     марямс+V+Conj+2Pl: марявлиде
     марямс+V+Conj+3Pl: марявольть
     марямс+V+Conj+1Sg\3Sg: марявлия
     марямс+V+Conj+2Sg\3Sg: марявлик
     марямс+V+Conj+3Sg\3Sg: марявлизе
     марямс+V+Conj+1Sg\3Pl: марявлинь
     марямс+V+Conj+2Sg\3Pl: марявлить
     марямс+V+Conj+3Sg\3Pl: марявлинзе
     марямс+V+Conj+1Pl\3: марявлинек
     марямс+V+Conj+2Pl\3: марявлинк
     марямс+V+Conj+3Pl\3: марявлизь
     марямс+V+Conj+1Sg\2Sg: марявлитинь
     марямс+V+Conj+3Sg\2Sg: марявлинзеть
     марямс+V+Conj+Default\2: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+2Sg\1Sg: марявлимик
     марямс+V+Conj+3Sg\1Sg: марявлимим
     марямс+V+Conj+Default\2: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Sg: мариксэлинь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Sg: мариксэлить
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Sg: мариксэль
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Pl: мариксэлинек
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Pl: мариксэлиде
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Pl: мариксэльть
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Sg\3Sg: мариксэлия
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Sg\3Sg: мариксэлик
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Sg\3Sg: мариксэлизе
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Sg\3Pl: мариксэлинь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Sg\3Pl: мариксэлить
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Sg\3Pl: мариксэлинзе
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Pl\3: мариксэлинек
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Pl\3: мариксэлинк
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Pl\3: мариксэлизь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+1Sg\2Sg: мариксэлитинь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Sg\2Sg: мариксэлинзеть
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+Default\2: мариксэлидизь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+2Sg\1Sg: мариксэлимик
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+3Sg\1Sg: мариксэлимим
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+Default\2: мариксэлимизь
     марямс+V+Cond+Inf: мариндерямс
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Sg: мариндерян
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Sg: мариндерят
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Sg: мариндеряй
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Pl: мариндерятано
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Pl: мариндерятадо
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Pl: мариндеряйть
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\3Sg: мариндеряса
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\3Sg: мариндерясак
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\3Sg: мариндерясы
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\3Pl: мариндерясынь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\3Pl: мариндерясыть
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\3Pl: мариндерясынзе
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Pl\3: мариндерясынек
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Pl\3: мариндерясынк
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Pl\3: мариндерясызь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+1Sg\2Sg: мариндерятан
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\2Sg: мариндерятанзат
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+Default\2: мариндерятадызь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+2Sg\1Sg: мариндерясамак
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+3Sg\1Sg: мариндерясамам
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+NonPast+Default\2: мариндерясамизь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Sg: мариндеринь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Sg: мариндерить
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Sg: мариндерясь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Pl: мариндеринек
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Pl: мариндериде
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Pl: мариндерясть
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\3Sg: мариндерия
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\3Sg: мариндерик
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\3Sg: мариндеризе
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\3Pl: мариндеринь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\3Pl: мариндерить
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\3Pl: мариндеринзе
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Pl\3: мариндеринек
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Pl\3: мариндеринк
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Pl\3: мариндеризь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+1Sg\2Sg: мариндеритинь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\2Sg: мариндеринзеть
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+Default\2: мариндеридизь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+2Sg\1Sg: мариндеримик
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+3Sg\1Sg: мариндеримим
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt1+Default\2: мариндеримизь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+1Sg: мариндерилинь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+2Sg: мариндерилить
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+3Sg: мариндериль
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+1Pl: мариндерилинек
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+2Pl: мариндерилиде
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+3Pl: мариндерильть
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+1Sg\3Sg: мариндерилия
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+2Sg\3Sg: мариндерилик
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\3Sg: мариндерилизе
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+1Sg\3Pl: мариндерилинь
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+2Sg\3Pl: мариндерилить
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+3Sg\3Pl: мариндерилинзе
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+1Pl\3: мариндерилинек
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+2Pl\3: мариндерилинк
     марямс+V+Cond+Ind+Prt2+3Pl\3: мариндерилизь
